Vermont, session 2025-2026, H61.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. chapter 15 is added to read:
CHAPTER 15. RIGHTS TO BODILY AUTONOMY AND
HEALTH CARE DECISION MAKING
§ 851. STATEMENT OF POLICY
The State of Vermont recognizes the rights of each individual to bodily
autonomy, to make the individual’s own health care decisions, and to be free to
VT LEG #379249 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.61
2025 Page 2 of 4
accept or refuse any health or medical intervention, testing, treatment, or
vaccine based on the individual’s own religious, conscientious, or personal
beliefs.
§ 852. COERCION AND INTERFERENCE PROHIBITED
(a)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State of
Vermont; its agencies, subdivisions, instrumentalities, and designees; and all
other employers, businesses, nonprofit organizations, institutions, facilities,
schools, churches and other places of worship, travel carriers, licensing
authorities, and other individuals and public and private and entities shall not
deny, restrict, infringe upon, or impose conditions on an individual’s rights to
bodily autonomy, to make the individual’s own health care decisions, and to be
free to accept or refuse any health or medical intervention, testing, treatment,
or vaccine based on the individual’s own religious, conscientious, or personal
beliefs.
(2) The prohibitions set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection
include not denying, restricting, infringing upon, or imposing conditions on an
individual’s employment, travel, education, child care, religion, benefits,
insurance, or participation in sports, camps, or other recreation based in whole
or in part on the exercise of an individual’s right to refuse any medical
intervention, testing, treatment, or vaccine based on the individual’s own
religious, conscientious, or personal beliefs.
VT LEG #379249 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.61
2025 Page 3 of 4
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of statute or rule to the contrary,
including a statute or rule addressing an outbreak, epidemic, or potential
outbreak or epidemic of a contagious, infectious, or communicable disease,
and notwithstanding any statute, rule, order, or directive that may be adopted
or promulgated in response to an emergency, including a national security
emergency, statewide emergency, local emergency, public health emergency,
or peacetime emergency, each individual shall retain the rights to bodily
autonomy, to make the individual’s own health care decisions, and to be free to
accept or refuse any health or medical intervention, testing, treatment, or
vaccine based on the individual’s own religious, conscientious, or personal
beliefs.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the right of a
parent to make decisions that the parent determines to be in the best interests of
the parent’s minor child or children.
§ 853. ENFORCEMENT
Any individual who suffers damage, loss, or injury as a result of any
conduct prohibited by section 852 of this chapter may bring an action in
Superior Court against the individual or entity that engaged in the conduct for
injunctive relief, compensatory and punitive damages, costs and reasonable
attorney’s fees, and other appropriate relief.
VT LEG #379249 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.61
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379249 v.1